Hawaii statutes.
§121-10 Administration. The adjutant
general shall from time to time make and publish such orders and regulations,
not inconsistent with law, as are necessary to bring the organization,
armament, equipment, and discipline of the organized militia to a state of
efficiency as nearly as possible approaching that of the army and air force of
the United States. The adjutant general shall attest all commissions issued to
military officers, appointments issued to warrant officers, maintain personnel
records, superintend preparation of all letters and reports required by the
United States from the State. The adjutant general shall have charge of the
state military reservations, armories, and all other property of the State kept
or used for military purposes. The adjutant general shall take an inventory at
least once each year of all military stores, property, and funds under the
adjutant general's jurisdiction. The adjutant general shall be the official
custodian of the military records of all persons from the State who served in
the armed forces of the United States during times of war or grave national
emergency, including those records which are turned over to the State by the
federal agency of selective service. The records shall be preserved
perpetually in accordance with rules and regulations established by the
adjutant general.

The adjutant general shall make an annual
report of the operations of the adjutant general's department. [L 1967, c 196,
pt of §1; HRS §121-10; gen ch 1985]

Cross References

Annual report, see §93-12.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next